Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.490

Basic training.

The basic training provided to criminal justice personnel by the commission must be consistent with the standards in RCW 10.120.020 and the model policies established by the attorney general under RCW 10.120.030.

[ 2021 c 324 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—2021 c 324: See note following RCW 10.120.010.